California statutes. Education Code
(d) The remainder
 computed in subdivision (c) shall be distributed in the same manner as state aid to school districts from funds appropriated to Section A of the State School Fund.

(e) If the remainder determined pursuant to subdivision (c) is a negative amount, no state aid shall be distributed to that county superintendent of schools pursuant to subdivision (d), and an amount of funds of that county superintendent of schools equal to that negative amount shall be deemed restricted and not available for expenditure during the current fiscal year. In the next fiscal year, that amount shall be considered local property tax revenue for purposes of the operation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(f) The calculations set forth in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b) exclude employer contributions for employees of charter schools funded pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section
 47633) of Chapter 6 of Part 26.8 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(g) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, this section shall be used only for purposes of allocating revenues received pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(h) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2033, and, as of January 1, 2034, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2034, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 4.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.   Inoperative July 1, 2033.    Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Allocation of Property Tax Revenues [2570. - 2573.]

2570.

For the 1980–81 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter the county superintendent of schools shall allocate property tax revenues pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 4.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

2571.

The Superintendent shall make the following computations for each county superintendent of schools:

(a) Add the property tax revenues received for the 1977–78 fiscal year pursuant to subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 2500, Section 2501 for purposes of Section 1705, Section 2502 for purposes of Section 56811, Section 2505 for special education tuition charges, Section 42909 for purposes of Section 56604, and Section 56364 or Section 56364.2, as applicable. For purposes of this subdivision, section references are to sections
 effective during the 1977–78 fiscal year.

(b) Divide the sum computed pursuant to subdivision (a) by the total amount of property tax revenues received by the county superintendent of schools for the 1977–78 fiscal year.

(c) Multiply the quotient computed pursuant to subdivision (b) by the total amount of property tax revenues received by the county superintendent of schools for the then current fiscal year.

(d) Subtract the product computed pursuant to subdivision (c) from the total amount of property tax revenues received by the county superintendent of schools for the then current fiscal year.

(e) For purposes of subdivisions (c) and (d), “total property tax revenues” include taxes on the secured roll, taxes on the unsecured roll, prior year taxes,
 subventions of property taxes, and, beginning in the 2012–13 fiscal year, revenues received pursuant to Sections 34177, 34179.5, 34179.6, and 34188 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 38, Sec. 5.   (SB 1016)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2572.

The product computed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2571 is the amount of property tax revenues to be allocated to special education programs. This amount shall be subtracted pursuant to Section 56836.15.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 2.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2573.

The remainder computed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2571 is the amount of property tax revenues to be allocated for programs funded pursuant to Section 2558.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 4.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.5. County Local Control Funding Formula [2574. - 2583.]

2574.

For the 2013–14 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent annually shall calculate a county local control funding formula for each county superintendent of schools as follows:

(a) Compute a county office of education operations grant equal to the sum of each of the following amounts:

(1) Six hundred fifty-five thousand nine hundred twenty dollars ($655,920).

(2) One hundred nine thousand three hundred twenty dollars ($109,320) multiplied by the number of school districts for which the county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction pursuant to Section 1253.

(3) (A) Seventy dollars ($70) multiplied by the number of units of countywide average daily attendance, up to a maximum of 30,000 units.

(B) Sixty dollars ($60) multiplied by the number of units of countywide average daily attendance for the portion of countywide average daily attendance, if any, above 30,000 units, up to a maximum of 60,000 units.

(C) Fifty dollars ($50) multiplied by the number of units of countywide average daily attendance for the portion of countywide average daily attendance, if any, above 60,000, up to a maximum of 140,000 units.

(D) Forty dollars ($40) multiplied by the number of units of countywide average daily attendance for the portion of countywide average daily attendance, if any, above 140,000 units.

(E) For
 purposes of this section, countywide average daily attendance means the aggregate number of annual units of average daily attendance within the county attributable to all school districts for which the county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction pursuant to Section 1253, charter schools authorized by school districts for which the county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction, and charter schools authorized by the county superintendent of schools.

(4) For the 2014–15 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, adjust each of the rates provided in the prior year pursuant to paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) by the percentage change in the annual average value of the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services for the United States, as published by the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the prior fiscal year. This percentage change shall be
 determined using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year compared with the annual average value of the same deflator for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the second preceding fiscal year, using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year, as reported by the Department of Finance.

(5) Commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year, add one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($175,000) to the amount specified in paragraph (2), as that rate was adjusted pursuant to paragraph (4).

(6) Commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year, add fourteen dollars ($14) to each of the amounts specified in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (3), as those rates were adjusted pursuant to paragraph (4).

(b) Determine the enrollment percentage of unduplicated
 pupils pursuant to the following:

(1) (A) For the 2013–14 fiscal year, divide the enrollment of unduplicated pupils in all schools operated by a county superintendent of schools in the 2013–14 fiscal year by the total enrollment in those schools in the 2013–14 fiscal year.

(B) For the 2014–15 fiscal year, divide the sum of the enrollment of unduplicated pupils in all schools operated by a county superintendent of schools in the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years by the sum of the total enrollment in those schools in the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years.

(C) For the 2015–16 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, divide the sum of the enrollment of unduplicated pupils in all schools operated by a county superintendent of schools in the current fiscal year and the two prior fiscal years by the
 sum of the total enrollment in those schools in the current fiscal year and the two prior fiscal years.

(D) (i) For purposes of the quotients determined pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C), the Superintendent shall use a county superintendent of schools’ enrollment of unduplicated pupils and total pupil enrollment in the 2014–15 fiscal year instead of the enrollment of unduplicated pupils and total pupil enrollment in the 2013–14 fiscal year if doing so would yield an overall greater percentage of unduplicated pupils.

(ii) It is the intent of the Legislature to review each county office of education’s enrollment of unduplicated pupils for the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years and provide one-time funding, if necessary, for a county office of education with higher enrollment of unduplicated pupils in the 2014–15 fiscal year as compared to the 2013–14 fiscal
 year.

(E) For purposes of determining the enrollment percentage of unduplicated pupils pursuant to this subdivision, enrollment in schools or classes established pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 48645) of Chapter 4 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 and the enrollment of pupils other than the pupils identified in clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c), shall be excluded from the calculation of the enrollment percentage of unduplicated pupils.

(F) The data used to determine the percentage of unduplicated pupils shall be final once that data is no longer used in the current fiscal year calculation of the percentage of unduplicated pupils. This subparagraph does not apply to a change that is the result of an audit that has been appealed pursuant to Section 41344.

(2) For purposes of this section, an “unduplicated pupil” is a pupil who is classified as an English learner, eligible for a free or reduced-price meal, or a foster youth. For purposes of this section, the definitions in Section 42238.01 of an English learner, a pupil eligible for a free or reduced-price meal, and foster youth shall apply. A pupil shall be counted only once for purposes of this section if any of the following apply:

(A) The pupil is classified as an English learner and is eligible for a free or reduced-price meal.

(B) The pupil is classified as an English learner and is a foster youth.

(C) The pupil is eligible for a free or reduced-price meal and is classified as a foster youth.

(D) The pupil is classified as an English
 learner, is eligible for a free or reduced-price meal, and is a foster youth.

(3) (A) Under procedures and timeframes established by the Superintendent, commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, a county superintendent of schools annually shall report the enrollment of unduplicated pupils, pupils classified as English learners, pupils eligible for free and reduced-price meals, and foster youth in schools operated by the county superintendent of schools to the Superintendent using the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System.

(B) The Superintendent shall make the calculations pursuant to this section using the data submitted through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System.

(C) The Controller shall include instructions, as appropriate, in the audit guide required by
 subdivision (a) of Section 14502.1, for determining if the data reported by a county superintendent of schools using the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System is consistent with pupil data records maintained by the county office of education.

(c) Compute an alternative education grant equal to the sum of the following:

(1) (A) (i) For the 2013–14 fiscal year to the 2022–23 fiscal year, inclusive, a base grant equal to the 2012–13 per pupil undeficited statewide average juvenile court school base revenue limit calculated pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 2550) of Chapter 12, as that article read on January 1, 2013, and as adjusted each fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (B). For purposes of this subparagraph, the 2012–13 statewide average juvenile court school base revenue limit shall be considered final as
 of the annual apportionment for the 2012–13 fiscal year, as calculated for purposes of the certification required on or before February 20, 2014, pursuant to Sections 41332 and 41339.

(ii) For the 2023–24 fiscal year, a base grant equal to the grade span-adjusted base grant for average daily attendance in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, calculated pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, for the 2022–23 fiscal year, multiplied by 1.33, and then adjusted pursuant to subparagraph (B) for the 2023–24 fiscal year.

(iii) Commencing with the 2024–25 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, a base grant equal to the amount calculated pursuant to clause (ii) and as adjusted each year pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(B) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, the per pupil base grant shall be adjusted by the percentage
 change in the annual average value of the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services for the United States, as published by the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the prior fiscal year. This percentage change shall be determined using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year compared with the annual average value of the same deflator for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the second preceding fiscal year, using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year, as reported by the Department of Finance.

(2) A supplemental grant equal to 35 percent of the base grant described in paragraph (1) multiplied by the enrollment percentage calculated in subdivision (b). The supplemental grant shall be expended in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42238.07.

(3) (A) A concentration grant equal to 35 percent of the base grant described in paragraph (1) multiplied by the greater of either of the following:

(i) The enrollment percentage calculated in subdivision (b) less 50 percent.

(ii) Zero.

(B) The concentration grant shall be expended in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42238.07.

(4) (A) Multiply the sum of paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) by the total number of units of average daily attendance for pupils attending schools operated by a county office of education, excluding units of average daily attendance for pupils attending schools or classes established pursuant to Article
 2.5 (commencing with Section 48645) of Chapter 4 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2, who are enrolled pursuant to any of the following:

(i) Probation-referred pursuant to Sections 300, 601, 602, and 654 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(ii) On probation or parole and not in attendance in a school.

(iii) Expelled for any of the reasons specified in subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 48915.

(B) Multiply the number of units of average daily attendance for pupils attending schools or classes established pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 48645) of Chapter 4 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 by the sum of the base grant calculated pursuant to paragraph (1), a supplemental grant equal to 35 percent of the base grant calculated pursuant to
 paragraph (1), and a concentration grant equal to 17.5 percent of the base grant calculated pursuant to paragraph (1). Funds provided for the supplemental and concentration grants pursuant to this calculation shall be expended in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42238.07.

(C) Add the amounts calculated in subparagraphs (A) and (B).

(5) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, and for purposes of this subdivision, average daily attendance shall be the sum of both of the following:

(A) The average daily attendance reported by the county superintendent of schools for the annual reporting period for the current fiscal year, or the prior fiscal year if the prior year total is greater, or the average of the three most recent prior fiscal years if the average total
 is greater than both the current year and the prior year.

(B) If applicable, the average daily attendance reported by a charter school in the county established pursuant to Section 47605.5 for the annual reporting period for the current fiscal year.

(d) Add the amount calculated in subdivision (a) to the amount calculated in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c).

(e) Add all of the following to the amount calculated in subdivision (d):

(1) The amount of funding a county superintendent of schools received for the 2012–13 fiscal year from funds allocated pursuant to the Targeted Instructional Improvement Block Grant program, as set forth in Article 6 (commencing with Section 41540) of Chapter 3.2 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2, as that
 article read on January 1, 2013.

(2) (A) The amount of funding a county superintendent of schools received for the 2012–13 fiscal year from funds allocated pursuant to the Home-to-School Transportation program, as set forth in former Article 2 (commencing with Section 39820) of Chapter 1 of Part 23.5 of Division 3 of Title 2, former Article 10 (commencing with Section 41850) of Chapter 5 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2, and the Small School District Transportation program, as set forth in former Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 42290) of Chapter 7 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2, as those articles read on January 1, 2013.

(B) If a home-to-school transportation joint powers agency, established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for purposes of providing pupil
 transportation, received an apportionment directly from the Superintendent pursuant to Item 6110-111-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2012, as identified in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2575, the joint powers agency may identify the member local educational agencies and transfer entitlement to that funding to any of those member local educational agencies by reporting to the Superintendent, on or before September 30, 2015, the reassignment of a specified amount of the joint powers agency’s 2012–13 fiscal year entitlement to the member local educational agency. Commencing with the 2015–16 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall add the reassigned amounts to the amounts calculated pursuant to this paragraph.

(C) Commencing in the 2023–24 fiscal year, the add-on amounts referenced in subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall receive the annual cost-of-living adjustment specified in subparagraph (B) of
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(3) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for each county office of education operating at least one juvenile court school pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 48645) of Chapter 4 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2, including a county office of education that authorized a charter school for that purpose pursuant to Section 47605.5.

(4) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for each county office of education operating at least one county community school pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 1980), including a county office of education that authorized a charter school for that purpose pursuant to Section 47605.5.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the funds
 allocated pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (e) be included in the local control and accountability plan template pursuant to Section 52064.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 2.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2575.

(a) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall calculate a base entitlement for the transition to the county local control funding formula for each county superintendent of schools based on the sum of the amounts computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive:

(1) Revenue limits in the 2012–13 fiscal year pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 2550) of Chapter 12, as that article read on January 1, 2013, adjusted only for changes in average daily attendance claimed by the county superintendent of schools for pupils identified in clauses (i), (ii), and (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 2574 and for pupils attending juvenile court schools. For purposes of this paragraph, the calculation of an amount per unit of average daily attendance for pupils attending juvenile court schools shall be considered final for purposes of this section as of the annual apportionment for the 2012–13 fiscal year, as calculated for purposes of the
 certification required on or before February 20, 2014, pursuant to Sections 41332 and 41339. All other average daily attendance claimed by the county superintendent of schools and any other average daily attendance used for purposes of calculating revenue limits pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 2550) of Chapter 12, as that article read on January 1, 2013, shall be considered final for purposes of this section as of the annual apportionment for the 2012–13 fiscal year, as calculated for purposes of the certification required on or before February 20, 2014, pursuant to Sections 41332 and 41339.

(2) The sum of all of the following:

(A) (i) The amount of funding received from appropriations contained in Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2012, as adjusted by Section 12.42, in the following Items: 6110-104-0001, 6110-105-0001, 6110-107-0001,
 6110-108-0001, 6110-111-0001, 6110-124-0001, 6110-128-0001, 6110-137-0001, 6110-144-0001, 6110-156-0001, 6110-181-0001, 6110-188-0001, 6110-189-0001, 6110-190-0001, 6110-193-0001, 6110-195-0001, 6110-198-0001, 6110-204-0001, 6110-208-0001, 6110-209-0001, 6110-211-0001, 6110-212-0001, 6110-227-0001, 6110-228-0001, 6110-232-0001, 6110-240-0001, 6110-242-0001, 6110-243-0001, 6110-244-0001, 6110-245-0001, 6110-246-0001, 6110-247-0001, 6110-248-0001, 6110-260-0001, 6110-265-0001, 6110-266-0001, 6110-267-0001, 6110-268-0001, and 6360-101-0001, 2012–13 fiscal year funding for the Class Size Reduction Program pursuant to Chapter 6.10 (commencing with Section 52120) of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2, as that chapter read on January 1, 2013, and 2012–13 fiscal year funding for pupils enrolled in community day schools who are mandatorily expelled pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48915. For purposes of this subparagraph, the 2012–13 fiscal year appropriations described in this subparagraph shall be considered
 final as of the annual apportionment for the 2012–13 fiscal year, as calculated for purposes of the certification required on or before February 20, 2014, pursuant to Sections 41332 and 41339.

(ii) If a home-to-school transportation joint powers agency, established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for purposes of providing pupil transportation, received an apportionment directly from the Superintendent pursuant to Item 6110-111-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2012, as identified in clause (i), the joint powers agency may identify the member local educational agencies and transfer entitlement to that funding to any of those member local educational agencies by reporting to the Superintendent, on or before September 30, 2015, the reassignment of a specified amount of the joint powers agency’s 2012–13 fiscal year entitlement to the member local educational
 agency. Commencing with the 2015–16 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall add the reassigned amounts to the amounts calculated pursuant to this paragraph. These funds shall be subject to the requirements specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (k).

(B) The amount of local revenues used to support a regional occupational center or program established and maintained by a county superintendent of schools pursuant to Section 52301.

(3) For the 2014–15 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of the amounts apportioned to the county superintendent of schools pursuant to subdivision (f) in all prior years.

(b) The Superintendent shall annually compute a county local control funding formula transition adjustment for each county superintendent of schools as follows:

(1) Subtract the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (a) from the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2574. A difference of less than zero shall be deemed to be zero.

(2) Divide the difference for each county superintendent of schools calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) by the total sum of the differences for all county superintendents of schools calculated pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Multiply the proportion calculated for each county superintendent of schools pursuant to paragraph (2) by the amount of funding specifically appropriated for purposes of subdivision (f). The
 amount calculated shall not exceed the difference for the county superintendent of schools calculated pursuant to paragraph (1).

(c) The Superintendent shall subtract from the amount calculated pursuant to subdivision (a) the sum of each of the following:

(1) Local property tax revenues received pursuant to Section 2573 in the then current fiscal year.

(2) The amount received pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 33607.5 of the Health and Safety Code that is considered property taxes pursuant to that section.

(3) The amount, if any, received pursuant to Sections 34177, 34179.5, 34179.6, 34183, and 34188 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) The amount, if any, received pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(d) The Superintendent shall subtract from the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2574 the sum of the amounts computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (c).

(e) The Superintendent shall annually apportion to each county superintendent of schools the amount calculated pursuant to subdivision (c) unless the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (c) is negative. If the amount computed is negative, except as provided in subdivision (f), an amount of property tax of the county superintendent of schools equal to the negative amount shall be deemed restricted and not available for expenditure during the fiscal year. In the following fiscal year, that amount, excluding any amount of funds used for purposes of subdivision (f), shall be considered restricted local property tax revenue for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 2578. State aid shall not be apportioned to the county superintendent of schools
 pursuant to this subdivision if the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (c) is negative.

(f) (1) The Superintendent shall apportion, from an appropriation specifically made for this purpose, the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (b), or, if the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (c) is negative, the sum of the amounts computed pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) if the sum if greater than zero.

(2) The Superintendent shall apportion any portion of the appropriation made for purposes of paragraph (1) that is not apportioned pursuant to paragraph (1) pursuant to the following calculation:

(A) Add the amount calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) to the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (a) for a county superintendent of schools.

(B) Subtract the amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) from the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2574 for the county superintendent of schools.

(C) Divide the difference for the county superintendent of schools computed pursuant to subparagraph (B) by the sum of the differences for all county superintendents of schools computed pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(D) Multiply the proportion computed pursuant to subparagraph (C) by the unapportioned balance in the appropriation. That product shall be the county superintendent of schools’ proportion of total need.

(E) Apportion to each county superintendent of schools the amount calculated pursuant to subparagraph (D), or if subdivision (c) is negative, apportion the sums of subdivisions
 (b) and (c) and subparagraph (D) of this subdivision if the sum is greater than zero.

(F) The Superintendent shall repeat the computation made pursuant to this paragraph, accounting for any additional amounts apportioned after each computation, until the appropriation made for purposes of paragraph (1) is fully apportioned.

(G) The total amount apportioned pursuant to this subdivision to a county superintendent of schools shall not exceed the difference for the county superintendent of schools calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(H) For purposes of this paragraph, the proportion of need that is funded from any appropriation made specifically for purposes of this subdivision in the then current fiscal year shall be considered fixed as of the second principal apportionment for that fiscal year.
 Adjustments to a county superintendent of schools’ total need computed pursuant to subparagraph (D) after the second principal apportionment for the then current fiscal year shall be funded based on the fixed proportion of need that is funded for that fiscal year pursuant to this subdivision, and shall be continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 14002.

(g) (1) For a county superintendent of schools for whom, in the 2013–14 fiscal year, the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (c) is less than the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (d), in the first fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the sum of the apportionments computed pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (f) is equal to, or greater than, the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (d) of this section, the Superintendent shall apportion to the county superintendent of schools the amount computed in subdivision (d) in that fiscal year and each fiscal
 year thereafter instead of the amounts computed pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (f).

(2) For a county superintendent of schools for whom, in the 2013–14 fiscal year, the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (c) is greater than the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (d), in the first fiscal year in which the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (c) would be less than the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (d), the Superintendent shall apportion to the county superintendent of schools the amount computed in subdivision (d) in that fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter instead of the amounts computed pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (f).

(3) In each fiscal year, the Superintendent shall determine the percentage of county superintendents of schools that are apportioned funding that is less than the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (d), as of the second
 principal apportionment of the fiscal year. If the percentage is less than 10 percent, the Superintendent shall apportion to those county superintendents of schools funding equal to the amount computed in subdivision (d) in that fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter instead of the amounts calculated pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (f).

(4) If the calculation pursuant to subdivision (d) is negative and the Superintendent apportions to a county superintendent of schools the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (d) pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of this subdivision, an amount of property tax of the county superintendent of schools equal to the negative amount shall be deemed restricted and not available for expenditure during that fiscal year. In the following fiscal year the restricted amount shall be considered restricted local property tax revenue for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 2578.

(h) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, the Superintendent
 shall apportion to a county superintendent of schools an amount of state aid, including any amount apportioned pursuant to subdivisions (f) and (g), that is no less than the amount calculated in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(i) (1) For the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years only, a county superintendent of schools who, in the 2012–13 fiscal year, from any of the funding sources identified in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a), received funds on behalf of, or provided funds to, a regional occupational center or program joint powers agency established in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for purposes of providing instruction to pupils enrolled in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, shall not redirect that funding for another purpose unless otherwise authorized by law or pursuant to an agreement between the regional
 occupational center or program joint powers agency and the contracting county superintendent of schools.

(2) For the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years only, if a regional occupational center or program joint powers agency established in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for purposes of providing instruction to pupils enrolled in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, received, in the 2012–13 fiscal year, an apportionment of funds directly from any of the funding sources identified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the Superintendent shall apportion that same amount to the regional occupational center or program joint powers agency.

(j) For the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years only, a county superintendent of schools who, in the 2012–13 fiscal year, from any of the funding sources
 identified in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a), received funds on behalf of, or provided funds to, a home-to-school transportation joint powers agency established in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for purposes of providing pupil transportation shall not redirect that funding for another purpose unless otherwise authorized by law or pursuant to an agreement between the home-to-school transportation joint powers agency and the contracting county superintendent of schools.

(k) (1) In addition to subdivision (j), of the funds a county superintendent of schools receives for home-to-school transportation programs, the county superintendent of schools shall expend, pursuant to former Article 2 (commencing with Section 39820) of Chapter 1 of Part 23.5 of Division 3 of Title 2, former Article 10 (commencing with Section 41850) of Chapter 5
 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2, and the Small School District Transportation program, as set forth in former Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 42290) of Chapter 7 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2, as those articles read on January 1, 2013, no less for those programs than the amount of funds the county superintendent of schools expended for home-to-school transportation in the 2012–13 fiscal year.

(2) For the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years only, if a home-to-school transportation joint powers agency established in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for purposes of providing pupil transportation received, in the 2012–13 fiscal year, an apportionment of funds directly from the Superintendent from any of the funding sources identified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the Superintendent shall apportion that same amount to the
 home-to-school transportation joint powers agency.

(3) For the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years only, of the funds a county superintendent of schools receives for purposes of regional occupational centers or programs, or adult education, the county superintendent of schools shall expend no less for each of those programs than the amount of funds the county superintendent of schools expended for purposes of regional occupational centers or programs, or adult education, respectively, in the 2012–13 fiscal year. For purposes of this paragraph, a county superintendent of schools may include expenditures made by a school district within the county for purposes of regional occupational centers or programs so long as the total amount of expenditures made by the school districts and the county superintendent of schools equals or exceeds the total amount required to be expended for purposes of regional occupational centers or programs pursuant to this
 paragraph and paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03.

(l) The funds apportioned pursuant to this section and Section 2574 shall be available to implement the activities required pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 52059.5) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 39, Sec. 2.   (AB 1825)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2575.1.

Commencing with the 2017–18 fiscal year, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall add to the amount to be apportioned pursuant to Section 2575 the amount computed as follows:

(a) Each county superintendent of schools funded pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2575 as of the 2016–17 second principal apportionment shall be allocated the greater of eighteen thousand six hundred ninety-seven dollars ($18,697) multiplied by the number of school districts for which the county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction pursuant to Section 1253 of the Education Code, or eighty thousand dollars ($80,000).

(b) Commencing with the 2018–19 fiscal year, the rates in subdivision (a) shall be adjusted by the
 cost-of-living increase applied pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2574.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 3.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2575.2.

(a) (1) For the 2018–19 fiscal year to the 2022–23 fiscal year, inclusive, the Superintendent shall add to the amount to be apportioned pursuant to Section 2575, the sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) and the following:

(A) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, the fiscal year allowance calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) using the 2018 local control funding formula assistance status report plus the allowance calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) using the 2017 local control funding formula assistance status report, divided by two.

(B) For the 2019–20 fiscal year to the 2022–23 fiscal year, inclusive, the allowance calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) for the current
 year local control funding formula assistance status report plus the allowance calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) for the prior two years’ local control funding formula assistance status reports, divided by three.

(2) For the 2023–24 fiscal year to the 2025–26 fiscal year, inclusive, the Superintendent shall add to the amount to be apportioned pursuant to Section 2575, the sum of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) and the allowance calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) for the current year local control funding formula assistance